California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The district may without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, accept contributions of money, rights-of-way, labor, materials, and any other property for the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of transit facilities, and may without limitation by any other provisions of this part enter into any contracts and cooperation with and accept cooperation from the federal government, state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, or any public agency in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, any such
 transit facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90482.

The district may plan for, establish, construct, finance and operate rapid transit facilities and service within or without the district’s boundaries, including making whatever contracts are necessary for the accomplishment of this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90484.

The district may construct and operate or acquire and operate works and facilities in, under, upon, over, across, or along any street or public highway or any stream, bay or watercourse, or over any of the lands which are the property of the state, to the same extent that such rights and privileges appertaining thereto are granted to municipalities within the state. The district shall not use any street or public highway in a manner to unnecessarily impair its usefulness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90485.

The district may enter into agreements for the joint use of any property and rights by the district and any city, public agency or public utility operating transit facilities; may enter into agreements with any city, public agency or public utility operating any transit facilities, either wholly or partially within, or without, the district, for the joint use of any property of the district or of such city, public agency or public utility, or the establishment of through routes, joint fares, transfer of passengers or pooling arrangements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90486.

The rates and charges for service furnished pursuant to this act shall be fixed by the board and shall be reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90487.

The board of supervisors or the city council of a municipality having territory located within the district may file a request for a hearing before the district board as to the reasonableness of any rates or charges fixed by the district and as to any proposal for fixing the location of facilities by the district. The request shall be in writing and shall state the subject matter on which a hearing is desired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90488.

Upon the filing of a request for hearing as provided in Section 90487 the district board shall fix the time and place for hearing. The time fixed shall not be less than 15 days nor more than 60 days from the date such request is filed. Notice of such hearing shall be given to the county or city requesting such hearing and shall be published by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90489.

At the time fixed for any hearing before the board any board of supervisors or city council eligible to file a request for hearing, not a party to the original request for hearing, may intervene and shall be entitled to be heard and to introduce evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90490.

Within 30 days after submission of the case, the board shall render its decision and its decision shall be final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Indebtedness [90500. - 90508.]

90500.

The district may borrow money and incur indebtedness, and may issue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness. No indebtedness shall be incurred exceeding the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district without the approval of 60 percent of the voters voting on the proposition to incur such indebtedness, except that a further vote of the voters is not required for any indebtedness incurred within the purposes and not exceeding the available amount of any previously authorized bond issue, and as to such indebtedness the proceeds of any of the bonds unexpended in the treasury of the district, or the par value of any of the bonds which are unsold shall be deemed a
 part of the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

90501.

The district may borrow money for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the district lawfully incurred after the commencement of the fiscal year, but prior to the time moneys from the tax levy for the fiscal year are received by the district, in a sum which shall not exceed five cents ($0.05) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of taxable property in the district at the time the moneys are borrowed, and may evidence such borrowing by notes bearing interest at a rate not to exceed six (6) percent per annum. The notes shall be payable from the tax levy from the then current fiscal year, which levy shall contain a sum sufficient to provide for the
 payment of the notes and the interest thereon. The form of said notes and the proceedings relating to their issuance and sale, will be governed by the applicable provisions contained in Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90501.5.

The board of directors of the district may, within a period of two years from and after the formation of the district, pursuant to a resolution adopted by it for the purpose, borrow money on certificates of indebtedness, promissory notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, in anticipation of the estimated tax revenue for the following fiscal year, to be repaid within four years from the date of borrowing with interest at a rate not to exceed 6 percent per annum, in order to enable the district to meet all of its necessary initial expenses of organization, construction, acquisition, maintenance, and operation. The total amount of money borrowed and indebtedness incurred
 under this section during this two-year period shall not exceed 50 percent of the total amount of estimated tax revenue as estimated by the county auditor of the county in which the district lies for the following fiscal year.

The form of said notes and the proceedings relating to their issuance and sale, will be governed by the applicable provisions contained in Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90502.

The district shall not incur an indebtedness for public works which in the aggregate exceeds 15 percent of the assessed value of all the real and personal property within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90503.

Indebtedness which has been incurred for the acquisition, construction, and operation of transit facilities, where the revenue from the transit facilities for three years or more next preceding has been sufficient to pay the interest and principal due on any bonds issued for its construction or acquisition, in addition to the cost of operation and maintenance, shall not be counted and included in ascertaining the limit of indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90504.

The district may accept, without limitation by any other provisions of this act requiring approval of indebtedness, contributions or loans from the United States, this state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency of either thereof, for the purpose of financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of transit facilities, and may enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, the United States, this state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency of either thereof, in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation, of any such
 transit facilities in accordance with any legislation which Congress or the Legislature of the State of California may have heretofore adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which aid, assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the United States or this state in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of any such transit facilities. The district may do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal or state legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any evidence of indebtedness issued under this section shall constitute a negotiable instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90505.

The district may purchase equipment such as cars, trolley buses and motorbuses, and rolling equipment, and may execute agreements, leases and equipment trust certificates in the forms customarily used by private corporations engaged in the transit business appropriate to effect the purchase and leasing of rolling equipment and may dispose of the equipment trust certificates upon the terms and conditions as the board may deem appropriate. All money required to be paid by the district pursuant to the agreements, leases and equipment trust certificates provided for in this section shall be payable solely from the revenues or income to be derived from the transit facilities
 and from grants and loans as provided in Section 90504. Payment for equipment, or the rental of equipment, may be made in installments and the deferred installments may be evidenced by equipment trust certificates payable solely from revenue or income as provided in this section, and title to the equipment shall not vest in the district until the equipment trust certificates are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90506.

The agreement to purchase or lease may direct the vendor or lessor to sell and assign or lease the rolling equipment to a bank or trust company, duly authorized to transact business in the State of California, as trustee, for the benefit and security of the equipment trust certificates and may direct the trustee to deliver the rolling equipment to one or more designated officers of the district and may authorize the district to simultaneously execute and deliver an installment purchase agreement or a lease of the equipment to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90507.

The agreements and leases shall be duly acknowledged before a person authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds and in the form required for acknowledgment of deeds. The agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall be authorized by resolution of the district and shall contain such covenants, conditions and provisions as may be deemed necessary or appropriate to insure the payment of the equipment trust certificates from the revenue or income to be derived from the transit system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90508.

The covenants, conditions and provisions of the agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall not conflict with any of the provisions of any trust agreement securing the payment of bonds, notes or certificates of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Investments [90520. - 90522.]

90520.

The district may invest any surplus money in its treasury, including money in any sinking fund, in any of the following:

(a) Its own bonds.

(b) Treasury notes, certificates of indebtedness, bills, bonds of the United States, or any other evidence of indebtedness secured by the full faith and credit of the United States.

(c) Obligations issued pursuant to the Federal Home Loan Bank Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1421) or the National Housing Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1701).

(d) Treasury notes or bonds of this state, or of any public corporation, municipal corporation, public district, or political subdivision within this state which are legal as security for the deposit of public funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90521.

Such investment may be made by direct purchase of any issue of such bonds, treasury notes, or obligations, or part thereof, at the original sale or by the subsequent purchase of the bonds, treasury notes, or obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90522.

Any bonds, treasury notes, or obligations purchased and held as investments by the district may from time to time be sold and the proceeds reinvested in bonds, treasury notes, or obligations as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Taxation [90540. - 90552.]

90540.

A district may levy, and collect or cause to be collected, taxes for any lawful purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90541.

If, in the opinion of the board, the revenues will not be sufficient for any and all lawful purposes, the board shall levy a tax for such purpose or purposes and fix the amount of money necessary to be raised therefor by taxation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90542.

The board shall, at the time of fixing the general tax levy and in the manner provided for the general tax levy, levy and collect annually until the district’s bonds are paid, or until there is a sum in the treasury of the district set apart for that purpose to meet all sums coming due for principal and interest on the bonds as they become due a tax sufficient to pay the annual interest on the bonds and such part of the principal thereof as becomes due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy will be available. If the maturity of the indebtedness created by the issue of bonds begins more than one year after the date of the issuance thereof, the tax
 shall be levied and collected annually at the time and in the manner aforesaid, sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due and to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal on or before maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90543.

The taxes required to be levied and collected on account of interest, principal and sinking fund of district bonds shall be in addition to all other taxes levied for district purposes, and shall be collected at the time and in the same manner as other district taxes are collected and be used for no other purpose than the payment of the bonds and accruing interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90544.

The board may provide for the assessment, levy, and collection of taxes by the district, including the sale of property to the district for delinquent taxes, with penalties, interest, and cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90545.

The board shall avail itself of the assessments made by the assessor of the county and of the assessments made by the State Board of Equalization for the county and shall take such assessments as the basis for district taxation and have its taxes collected by the tax collector of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90546.

In such case the county assessor shall, on or before the third Monday in August of each year, transmit to the board a statement in writing showing the total value of all property within the district, ascertained from the assessments referred to in Section 90545 as equalized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90547.

The board shall, on or before the first weekday in September, or if such weekday falls upon a holiday then on the first business day thereafter, fix the rate of taxes, designating the number of cents or fractions thereof upon each hundred dollars, using as a basis the value of property transmitted to the board by the county assessor, which rate of taxation shall be sufficient to raise the amount previously fixed by the board, subject to a maximum limitation of five cents ($0.05) per one hundred dollars ($100) assessed valuation. These acts by the board shall constitute a value assessment of the property and a valid levy of the taxes so fixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90548.

The board shall immediately after fixing the rate of taxes as above provided transmit to the county assessor of the county a statement of the rate of taxes fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90549.

The district’s taxes so levied shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes. When collected the net amount, ascertained as provided in this article, shall be paid to the treasurer of the district, under the general requirements and penalties provided by law for the settlement of other taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90550.

Whenever any real property has been sold for taxes and has been redeemed, the money paid for redemption shall be apportioned and paid to the district by the county treasurer in the proportion which the tax due to the district bears to the total tax for which the property was sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90551.

The compensation to be charged by and paid to any county for the performance of services under this article shall be fixed by agreement between the board of supervisors of the county and the board. The compensation shall in no event exceed one-half of 1 percent of all money collected for the district. The compensation collected by the county shall be placed to the credit of the county general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90552.

All taxes levied under this act are a lien on the property on which they are levied. The enforcement of the collection of such taxes shall be in the same manner and by the same means provided by law for the enforcement of liens for county taxes, all the provisions of law relating to the enforcement of the latter being made a part of this act so far as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Claims [90570. - 90570.]

90570.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 700) of Division 3.5 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Bonds [90600. - 90721.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance [90600. - 90612.]

90600.

The district may from time to time incur a bonded indebtedness as provided in this chapter to pay the cost of acquiring, constructing, or completing the whole or any portion of any, transit facilities, or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90601.

Whenever the board by resolution passed by vote of two-thirds of all its members determines that the public interest or necessity demands the acquisition, construction, or completion by the district of any transit facilities or any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district, the cost of which will be too great to be paid out of the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district, it may at any subsequent meeting of the board provide by ordinance for the submission of the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness for the purpose set forth in the resolution to
 the voters of the district at a special bond election held for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90602.

In lieu of a resolution passed by the board, proceedings for the issuance of bonds for the purposes provided in this chapter may be initiated by petition of the voters of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90603.

Whenever any petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 15 percent of the total vote cast at the last general election is presented to the board asking for the acquisition, construction, or completion of the whole or any portion of any transit facilities or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district, and also asking that a bonded indebtedness be incurred to pay the cost thereof, the secretary of the district shall immediately examine and verify the signatures of the petition and certify the result of the examination to
 the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90604.

If the required number of signatures is found to be genuine, the secretary shall transmit to the board an authentic copy of the petition without the signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90605.

Upon receiving a petition with the certificate of the secretary stating that it contains the required number of signatures, the board shall formulate for submission to the voters of the district at a special bond election called for that purpose the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness for the purposes set forth in the petition. In its discretion the board may defer the calling of the election until the next general election to be held in the district in order to consolidate them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90606.

The ordinance calling a special bond election shall fix the date on which the election will be held, and the manner of holding the election and of voting for or against incurring the indebtedness. It shall also recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the transit facilities, works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property proposed to be acquired, constructed, or completed, the amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid on the indebtedness, which shall not exceed 6 percent per annum, payable semiannually or annually the
 first year and thereafter semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90607.

Propositions for incurring indebtedness for more than one object or purpose may be submitted at the same election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90608.

Any special bond election may be held separately, or may be consolidated with any other election authorized by law at which the voters of the district may vote. If a special bond election is consolidated with any other election, the provisions of this chapter setting forth the precedure for the calling and holding of the special bond election shall be complied with, except that the ordinance calling the election need not set forth the election precincts, polling places, and officers of election shall be the same as those set forth in the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings calling the election with which the special bond election is consolidated, and shall refer to
 the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings by number and title, or by other definite description.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90609.

The ordinance shall be published, and no other notice of election need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90610.

The board shall comply with Article 3 (commencing with Section 9160) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code, the provisions of which are applicable to any bond election held pursuant to this article. Wherever the words “county clerk” or “county elections official” appear in the Elections Code the words “secretary of the board” shall be substituted, for the purposes of this article, and wherever the words “board of supervisors” appear in the Elections Code, the words “board of directors” shall be substituted, and wherever the words “district
 attorney or county counsel” appear in the Elections Code, the words “attorney for the district” shall be substituted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 204.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

90611.

The votes of 60 percent of all the voters voting on the proposition at the election are required to authorize the issuance of general obligation bonds under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

90612.

If the proposition submitted at a special bond election fails to receive the requisite number of votes, the board shall not within six months after the election hold another special election for the submission of a proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness substantially the same as the proposition voted upon at a prior election unless a petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 15 percent of the total vote cast at the last general election is filed with the board, requesting that the proposition, or a proposition substantially the same, be submitted at an election to be called for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Form and Content [90620. - 90623.]

90620.

Bonds authorized by this chapter shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board; except that payment shall begin not later than 10 years from the date thereof and shall be completed in not more than 50 years from that date.

The board may divide any issue of bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter into two or more series, and may fix different dates of issuance and different maturity dates for the bonds of each series. The bonds of each series shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board, and the board shall fix a date not more than 10 years from the date of issuance of each series for the earliest
 maturity of such series, and shall fix a date not more than 50 years from the date of issuance of each series for the final maturity of such series.

Pending the actual issuance or delivery of bonds, a district may issue temporary or interim bonds, certificates, or receipts, of any denomination, whatsoever, with or without coupon, and in such form as may be prescribed by the board to be exchanged for definite bonds when ready for delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90621.

The bonds shall be issued in such denominations as the board determines, except that no bonds shall be issued of a denomination less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor of a greater denomination than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or any multiple thereof, and shall be payable on the day and at the place or places fixed in the bonds, and with interest at the rate specified therein, payable semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90622.

The board may at any time prior to the issuance and sale of any bonds provide for the call and redemption of any or all of the bonds on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity at not exceeding the par value and accrued interest plus a premium of not exceeding 5 percent upon the principal amount of the bonds, in which event the call price fixed by the board shall be set forth on the face of the bond. Notice of such redemption shall be published. If there is no newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the district, then the publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the county in which
 the district or any part thereof is situated. The first publication shall be at least 30 days prior to the date fixed for the redemption. After the date fixed for such redemption interest on the bonds thereafter shall cease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90623.

The bonds shall be signed by the president of the board or by such officer of the district as the board shall by resolution authorize and designate for that purpose. They shall also be signed by the treasurer, and be countersigned by the secretary. The coupons of the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and be signed by the treasurer. All signatures and countersignatures, except one of said signatures or countersignatures on the bonds, may be printed, lithographed, or engraved. If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, the signature or countersignature is
 nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if he had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Issue and Sale [90640. - 90642.]

90640.

The bonds may be issued and sold for not less than their par value, but otherwise as the board determines. Before selling any bonds or any part thereof, the board shall give notice inviting sealed bids in such manner as the board may prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board may reject all bids received, if any, and either again give notice inviting bids or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90641.

All premiums and accrued interest received on the sale of bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds. The remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the district treasury to the credit of the proper fund, and shall be used exclusively for the objects or purposes for which the bonds were voted; provided that when said objects and purposes have been accomplished any moneys remaining shall be transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds, and that when all principal of and interest on the bonds shall have been paid, any balance of money then remaining
 shall be transferred to the general fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90642.

In lieu of the immediate levy of a tax to pay the interest or any part thereof on any bonded indebtedness incurred in accordance with this part the board may, in the estimate of the amount of money necessary to be raised by the bonds, include a sum sufficient to pay interest on all of the bonds or part thereof during the period of acquisition, construction, or completion, but for no period in excess of five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Refunding [90660. - 90666.]

90660.

Whenever the board by resolution passed by a vote of two-thirds of all its members determines that the refunding of the whole or any portion of the bonded indebtedness will be of advantage to the district the board may refund the bonded indebtedness or any portion thereof and issue refunding bonds of the district therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90661.

The issuance of refunding bonds shall not be construed as the incurring or increase of an indebtedness within the meaning of this part, and the approval of the voters is not required for the issuance of refunding bonds. The board may provide for the call and redemption of any or all of the bonds on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity in the ordinance authorizing the issuance of the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90662.

Except as otherwise provided, the provisions of this chapter shall substantially govern as to all matters pertaining to the issuance of refunding bonds, including and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the form, execution, issuance, maturity, redemption, refunding, validation, the payment of interest from bond funds, and the status of the bonds as investments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90663.

Refunding bonds shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding the interest rate on the refunded bonds, but payment of the refunding bonds shall begin not later than one year from the date thereof and be complete in not more than 40 years from that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90664.

The proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds shall be applied only to the purchase, or retirement at not more than par and accrued interest, or the call price, of the bonded indebtedness for which the refunding bonds were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90665.

In lieu of selling refunding bonds and using the proceeds to purchase or retire the bonds to be refunded, the board may exchange refunding bonds at not less than par and accrued interest for the bonds so refunded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90666.

Whenever outstanding bonds are refunded they shall be surrendered to the treasurer of the district, who shall cancel them by endorsing on their face the manner in which the refunding was effected (whether by exchange or purchase, and the amount for which so purchased, if any) and by perforating through each bond and each coupon attached thereto the word “canceled” together with the date of cancellation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Status as Investments [90680. - 90681.]

90680.

All bonds including refunding bonds issued by a district are legal investments for all trust funds and for the funds of all insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, and trust companies, and for the State School Fund and for all sinking funds under the control of the State Treasurer. Whenever any money or funds may by law be invested in or loaned upon the security of bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts, in the state, such money or funds may be invested in or loaned upon the security of the bonds of the district; and whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts by law may be used as security for
 the faithful performance or execution of any court or private trust or of any other act, bonds of the district may be so used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90681.

All bonds of the district, to the same extent as bonds of any other municipality, are legal for use by any state or national bank or banks in the state as security for the deposit of funds of the state or of any county, city and county, city, municipality, or other public or municipal corporation within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Validating Proceedings [90700. - 90700.]

90700.

An action to determine the validity of bonds, including refunding bonds, may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Revenue Bonds [90720. - 90721.]

90720.

As an alternative procedure for the raising of funds, the district is authorized to issue bonds, payable from revenues of any facility or enterprise to be acquired or constructed by a district, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), all of the provisions of which are applicable to a district created pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90721.

The district is a local agency within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). The term “enterprise” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 shall, for all purposes of this part, include transit facilities and any and all parts thereof and all additions, extensions and improvements thereto and all other facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed or completed by the district. A district may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for any one or more facilities or enterprises authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by a district or,
 in the alternative may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for the acquisition, construction and completion of any one of such facilities. Nothing in this article shall prevent a district from availing itself of, or making use of, any procedure provided in this part for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the facilities or works authorized hereunder, and all proceedings may be carried on simultaneously, or in the alternative, as the directors may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Annexation of Cities [90770. - 90880.]



  ARTICLE 1. Annexation Agreement [90770. - 90774.]

90770.

Any city not included within the boundaries of the district may be annexed thereto in the manner provided in this chapter, and if such annexation is successful, shall be entitled to seat one member on the district’s board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90771.
